Washington statutes.
RCW 6.21.130

Effect of reversal of judgment on sale of real property.

A purchaser of real property sold on execution, or a purchaser's successor in interest, who is evicted in consequence of the reversal of the judgment may recover from the plaintiff in the execution the price paid with interest and the costs and disbursements of the eviction suit.

[ 1987 c 442 s 613; Code 1881 s 368; 1877 p 80 s 371; 1869 p 96 s 364; RRS s 592. Formerly RCW 6.24.110.]